test/src/morphology/V-loulw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - loulõ: # Verb 17 'eng /est laulda/fin' - full paradigm
     loulõ+V+Inf: loulõ
     loulõ+V+Ger: loulõs
     loulõ+V+Sup: lōlam
     loulõ+V+Sup+Ine: lōlamõs
     loulõ+V+Sup+Ela: lōlamõst
     loulõ+V+Sup+Tra: lōlamõks
     loulõ+V+Sup+Abe: lōlamõt
     loulõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lōlab
     loulõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lōlat
     loulõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lōlabõd
     loulõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lōliz
     loulõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [lōlizt, lōliztõ]
     loulõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [lōlizt, lōliztõ]
     loulõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: loul
     loulõ+V+Cond+Sg3: lōlaks
     loulõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: lōla
     loulõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: loulõ
     loulõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: lōlagid
     loulõ+V+Jus+Sg3: lōlag
     loulõ+V+QuoSg3: lōlaji
     loulõ+V+ActPrfPrc: loulõn
     loulõ+V+PssPrfPrc: louldõd
